th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งฝาครอบกระบะท้าย: ยึดกับฝาครอบกระบะ; ขันนอต / ต้องเจาะ; หนีบ (ไม่ต้องเจาะ); แบบผสม / ไฮบริด; ระบบราง/แทร็ก; ยึดกับช่องเสียบขอบกระบะ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil montaže pokrova tovarnog prostora: Montaža na rubove tovarnog prostora; Na vijke / potrebno bušenje; Na stezaljke (bez bušenja); Kombinirano/hibridno; Sustav šina/vodilica; Montaža u džepove nosača; Ostalo
nl: Montagestijl laadbakafdekking: Bedcap-montage; Aanboutbaar / boren vereist; Klembevestiging (zonder boren); Combinatie / hybride; Rail-/tracksysteem; Stake pocket-montage; Overige
pl: Styl montażu pokrywy tonneau: Montaż na burtach skrzyni; Na śruby / wymaga wiercenia; Zaciskowy (bez wiercenia); Kombinowany/hybrydowy; Montaż na szynach/prowadnicach; Montaż w gniazdach kłonic (stake pockets); Inny
el: Στυλ τοποθέτησης καλύμματος καρότσας: Στερέωση στο κάλυμμα καρότσας; Βιδωτό / απαιτείται τρύπημα; Με σφιγκτήρες (χωρίς τρύπημα); Συνδυασμός / υβριδικό; Σύστημα με ράγες/οδηγούς; Στερέωση σε υποδοχές πασσάλων; Άλλο
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж на tonneau cover: Монтаж върху покривало за каросерия; С болтове / изисква пробиване; Със скоби (без пробиване); Комбиниран / хибриден; Релсова система; Монтаж в джобовете на каросерията; Друго
ja: トノカバーマウントスタイル: ベッドキャップマウント; ボルトオン/穴あけ加工必要; クランプオン (穴あけ加工不要); コンビネーション/ハイブリッド; レール/トラックシステム; ステークポケットマウント; その他
cs: Styl montáže krytu korby: Montáž na lem korby; Na šrouby / vyžaduje vrtání; Na svorky (bez vrtání); Kombinovaná / hybridní; Systém s kolejnicemi/drážkami; Montáž do otvorů pro klanice; Jiné
sl-SI: Stil montaže pokrova kesona: Nosilec na robu kesona; Pritrditev z vijaki / potrebno vrtanje; Pritrditev s sponkami (brez vrtanja); Kombinirano / hibridno; Sistem tirnic/vodil; Montaža v žepe za količke (stake pockets); Drugo
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt nắp thùng xe bán tải: Gắn trên viền thùng xe; Bắt bu-lông / Cần khoan lỗ; Dạng kẹp (không cần khoan); Kết hợp / Lai; Hệ thống đường ray/rãnh trượt; Gắn vào lỗ cọc; Khác
tr: Kasa örtüsü montaj stili: Kasa üstü montaj; Cıvatalı / delme gerektirir; Kelepçeli (delme gerektirmez); Kombinasyon / hibrit; Ray/kızak sistemi; Kasa kenar cebi montajı; Diğer
hu: Tonneau fedél rögzítési stílusa: Platóperemre szerelhető; Csavaros / fúrást igényel; Bilincses (fúrást nem igényel); Kombinált / hibrid; Sínrendszer; Rögzítőnyílásba szerelhető; Egyéb
da: Monteringsstil for tonneau-cover: Montering på laddæksel; Bolt-on / kræver boring; Klemme-på (kræver ikke boring); Kombination/hybrid; Skinne-/sporsystem; Montering i stolpehuller; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da capa para caixa de carga: Montagem em tampa da caixa; Aparafusado/perfuração necessária; De grampo (sem perfuração); Combinação/híbrido; Sistema de calhas/trilhos; Montagem em suportes da caixa; Outro
zh-CN: 车厢盖安装方式: 车斗盖安装; 螺栓固定 / 需钻孔; 夹钳固定（免打孔）; 组合 / 混合式; 导轨/轨道系统; 柱套安装; 其他
ru: Стиль крепления тента багажника: Крепление на крышку кузова; На болтах / требуется сверление; На зажимах (без сверления); Комбинированное / гибридное; Система направляющих/рельс; Крепление в отверстия бортов; Другое
nb: Monteringsstil for tonneau-deksel: Feste på lasteplankant; Påskrudd / krever boring; Klemfeste (uten boring); Kombinasjon/hybrid; Skinnesystem; Feste i stolpehull; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação da tampa tipo tonneau: Montagem na borda da caçamba; Parafusado / necessário perfurar; Fixação por grampos (sem furos); Combinação / híbrido; Sistema de trilhos; Encaixe no orifício da caçamba; Outros
fi: Lavakatteen asennustyyli: Lavakaiteen kiinnitys; Pultattava / vaatii poraamista; Puristinkiinnitys (ei porausta); Yhdistelmä / hybridi; Kisko-/urajärjestelmä; Tolppareikäkiinnitys; Muu
sk-SK: Montáž krytu korby: Montáž na okraj korby; Skrutkovacie / vyžaduje sa vŕtanie; Svorkové (bez vŕtania); Kombinované / hybridné; Systém koľajníc/drážok; Montáž do vreciek na klanice; Iné
zh-TW: 尾箱平板蓋安裝樣式: 車斗蓋安裝; 螺栓固定 / 需鑽孔; 夾具安裝 (免鑽孔); 組合式 / 混合式; 軌道/滑軌系統; 柵欄孔安裝; 其他
es: Estilo de montaje de la cubierta tonneau: Montaje en tapa de caja; Atornillado/requiere perforación; Con abrazadera (sin perforación); Combinación/híbrido; Sistema de riel/pista; Montaje en cavidad de estaca; Otro
sv: Typ av montering för tonneau-kåpa: Kåpmontering; Påbultad/borrning krävs; Fastklämd (ingen borrning); Kombination/hybrid; Sken-/spårsystem; Montering i stolphål; Övrigt
fr: Type de fixation du couvre-benne: Montage sur rebord de benne; Boulonné/perçage requis; À pince (sans perçage); Combinaison/hybride; Système de rail/piste; Montage sur poches de piquet; Autre
ro-RO: Stil de montare a prelatei pentru benă: Montare pe marginea benei; Fixare cu șuruburi / necesită găurire; Fixare cu cleme (fără găurire); Combinație / hibrid; Sistem cu șine; Montare în locașurile pentru stâlpi; Altele
de: Anbringungsart der Ladeflächenabdeckung: Befestigung an Ladeflächenkante; Geschraubt / Bohren erforderlich; Geklemmt (kein Bohren); Kombination / Hybrid; Schienen-/Laufsystem; Befestigung in Rungentasche; Sonstige
en: Tonneau cover mounting style: Bed cap mount; Bolt-on / drill required; Clamp-on (no-drill); Combination / hybrid; Rail/track system; Stake pocket mount; Other
it: Stile di montaggio del Tonneau cover: Supporto per sponda del cassone; Bullonato/foratura necessaria; A morsetto (senza foratura); Combinato/ibrido; Sistema a binario/guida; Supporto per fori di ancoraggio; Altro
ko: 토노 커버 장착 스타일: 베드 캡 마운트; 볼트온/드릴링 필요; 클램프온(무타공); 조합/하이브리드; 레일/트랙 시스템; 스테이크 포켓 마운트; 기타
lt-LT: Atviro kėbulo uždangalų tvirtinimo būdas: Tvirtinama prie borto apsaugų; Prisukama / reikia gręžti; Prispaudžiama (nereikia gręžti); Kombinuota / hibridinė; Bėgelių / kreipiančiųjų sistema; Tvirtinama prie šoninių angų; Kita